Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1750.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 427.30 of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
It shall be unlawful for a pregnant woman who has been issued a
medical marijuana patient license to intentionally use marijuana
while she is knowingly pregnant. "Marijuana" shall have the same
meaning as such term is defined in Section 2-101 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10401 TJ 01/05/25

Req. No. 10401 Page 1